Illinois, session 104th, HB763.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Uniform Electronic Transactions in Dental 5Care Billing Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 111/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Uniform Electronic Transactions in Dental Care Billing Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-146, eff. 7-23-21.)